test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_23ii_assii_oahpa_gt-norm-dial_Por.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - assii ok: # Noun 'sak'
     assii+N+Sg+Nom: assii
     assii+N+Sg+Gen: assiin
     assii+N+Sg+Par: assiita
     assii+N+Sg+Tra: assiiksi
     assii+N+Sg+Abe: assiitta
     assii+N+Sg+Ine: assiissa
     assii+N+Sg+Ela: assiista
     assii+N+Sg+Ill: assiisseen
     assii+N+Sg+Ade: assiila
     assii+N+Sg+Abl: assiilta
     assii+N+Sg+All: assiile
     assii+N+Sg+Ess: assiina
     assii+N+Pl+Nom: assiit
     assii+N+Pl+Gen: assiitten
     assii+N+Pl+Par: assiita
     assii+N+Pl+Tra: assiiksi
     assii+N+Pl+Abe: assiitta
     assii+N+Pl+Ine: assiissa
     assii+N+Pl+Ela: assiista
     assii+N+Pl+Ill: assiissiin
     assii+N+Pl+Ade: assiila
     assii+N+Pl+Abl: assiilta
     assii+N+Pl+All: assiile
     assii+N+Pl+Ess: assiina
     assii+N+Pl+Com: assiine
